Hawaii statutes.
§489D-12.5 Penalties and other charges.
Administrative penalties and other charges assessed under this chapter shall be
deposited into the compliance resolution fund established pursuant to section
26-9(o). [L 2008, c 195, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 167, §8]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next